Alaska statutes. Title 30. Navigation, Harbors, Shipping, and Transportation Facilities.
Article 2. Purpose and General Powers.

Sec. 30.17.100.
Purpose of the authority.

The purpose of the authority is to develop and implement a comprehensive reuse and redevelopment plan for the territory encompassed by the Adak Naval Air Facility in a manner that will attract business, create jobs, and advance the general prosperity and economic welfare of the people of the state by

administering in a manner consistent with the purpose of the authority the assets transferred to the authority by the federal government, including facilities and other real or personal property, located at the Adak Naval Air Facility;

entering into necessary agreements with the federal government for operation of the facilities comprising the Adak Naval Air Facility;

operating or contracting with others to operate enterprises and other facilities located at the Adak Naval Air Facility; and

cooperating and acting in conjunction with other organizations, public and private, the objects of which are the promotion and advancement of economic use of the facilities located at the Adak Naval Air Facility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.110.
Powers of the authority.

In furtherance of its corporate purposes, the authority may, in addition to other powers that it may have by law,

sue and be sued;

have a seal and alter the seal at its pleasure;

adopt and amend bylaws for its organization and internal management;

adopt regulations governing the exercise of its corporate powers;

subject to AS

30.17.130(c)

, accept title to, or other interest in, assets transferred to the authority by the federal government, including facilities and other real or personal property, located at the Adak Naval Air Facility;

lease to others a project acquired by it for the rentals and upon the terms and conditions the authority may consider advisable, including, without limitation, provisions for options to purchase or renew;

issue and secure the payment of bonds, including revenue bonds; provide for the rights of holders of the bonds; and purchase, hold, and dispose of bonds;

sell, by installment sale or otherwise, exchange, donate, convey, or encumber in any manner by mortgage or by creation of any other security interest, real or personal property owned by it, or in which it has an interest, including a project, when, in the judgment of the authority, the action is in furtherance of its corporate purposes;

accept gifts, grants, or loans from, and enter into contracts or other transactions regarding them with, a federal agency or an agency or instrumentality of the state, a municipality, a private organization, or other source;

deposit or invest its funds, subject to agreements with bondholders;

acquire, manage, and operate projects as the authority considers necessary or appropriate to serve a public purpose;

enter into contracts or other transactions with a federal agency, with an agency or instrumentality of the state or of a municipality, or with a private organization or other entity consistent with the exercise of any power under this chapter;

charge fees or other forms of remuneration for the use or possession of the projects described in (11) of this section in accordance with the agreements described in (12) of this section, other agreements pertaining to the projects, covenants, or representations made in bond documents pertaining to the projects, or regulations of the authority pertaining to the projects.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.120.
Administrative procedure.

The provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act regarding the adoption of regulations under AS

44.62.040

—

44.62.319

apply to the authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, substituted “AS

44.62.040

–

44.62.319

” for “AS

44.62.040

–

44.62.320

” near the end.

Sec. 30.17.130.
Limitation on powers.

The authority has only the powers expressly granted in this chapter, reasonably implied from this chapter, or reasonably necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and to exercise the powers expressly granted in or reasonably implied from this chapter.

The authority does not have powers of

eminent domain;

taxation;

land use planning;

zoning;

permitting; or

other similar governmental powers.

The authority may not accept transfer by the federal government of title to, an interest in, control over, or responsibility for a facility or other real or personal property located at the Adak Naval Air Facility unless sufficient federal or other money is available to the authority to manage the property or operate the facility at a minimal level for two years after the date of the transfer. The director of the office of management and budget shall determine whether sufficient money is available to the authority with respect to each proposed transfer subject to this subsection, and approve or disapprove the proposed transfer.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the authority may not enter into a trust indenture or contract that has the effect of precluding the transfer of the assets and liabilities of the authority to a successor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)